apertium-sux.sux.lexd
LEXICON WholeWords
_(_)<num>:...-kam
1(asz)<num>:1(asz)
1(disz)<num>:1(asz)-a
1(asz@c)<num>:1(asz@c)
1(ban)<n>:1(ban2)
1(bariga)<n>:1(barig)
1(bariga)<n>:1(barig)
1(barig)<n>:1(barig)-ta
1(bur'u)<n>:1(bur'u)
1(bur)<n>:1(bur3)
1(disz)<num>:1(disz)
1(disz)<num>:1(disz)
1(disz)<num>:1(disz)-kam
1(disz)<num>:1(disz)-kam
1(disz)<num>:1(disz)-kam
1(disz)<num>:1(disz)-kam-ma-asz
1(disz)<num>:1(disz)-sze3
1(disz)<num>:1(disz)-ta
1(disz@t)<num>:1(disz@t)
1(disz@t)<num>:1(disz@t)-kam
1(disz@t)<num>:1(disz@t)-kam
1(disz@t)<num>:1(disz@t)-ta
1(esze)<n>:1(esze3)
1(gesz'u)<num>:1(gesz'u)
1(gesz'u)<num>:1(gesz'u)
1(gesz)<num>:1(gesz2)
1(iku)<n>:1(iku)
1(szar)<n>:1(szar2)
1(u)<num>:1(u)
1(u)<num>:1(u)-am3
1(u)<num>:1(u)-kam
1(u)<num>:1(u)-sze3
1(u)<num>:1(u)-ta
2(disz)<num>:1/2(disz)
2(disz)<num>:1/2(disz)-sze3
2(disz)<num>:1/2(disz)-ta
2(iku)<n>:1/2(iku)
3(disz)<num>:1/3(disz)
3(disz)<num>:1/3(disz)-am3
3(disz)<num>:1/3(disz)-kam
3(disz)<num>:1/3(disz)-ta
3(disz)<num>:1/3(disz){sza}
4(iku)<n>:1/4(iku)
2(asz)<num>:2(asz)
2(asz)<num>:2(asz)
2(ban)<n>:2(ban2)
2(ban)<n>:2(ban2)
2(bariga)<n>:2(barig)
2(bariga)<n>:2(barig)
2(bariga)<n>:2(barig)-ta
2(bur)<n>:2(bur3)
2(disz)<num>:2(disz)
2(disz)<num>:2(disz)
2(disz)<num>:2(disz)-am3
2(disz)<num>:2(disz)-kam
2(disz)<num>:2(disz)-kam
2(disz)<num>:2(disz)-kam
2(disz)<num>:2(disz)-kam
2(disz)<num>:2(disz)-sze3
2(disz)<num>:2(disz)-ta
2(disz@t)<num>:2(disz@t)
2(disz@t)<num>:2(disz@t)-kam
2(esze)<n>:2(esze3)
2(gesz'u)<num>:2(gesz'u)
2(gesz'u)<num>:2(gesz'u)-kam
2(gesz)<num>:2(gesz2)
2(gesz)<num>:2(gesz2)-kam
2(iku)<n>:2(iku)
2(u)<num>:2(u)
2(u)<num>:2(u)
2(u)<num>:2(u)
2(u)<num>:2(u)-am3
2(u)<num>:2(u)-kam
3(disz)<num>:2/3(disz)
3(disz)<num>:2/3(disz)-kam
3(disz)<num>:2/3(disz){sza}
3(asz)<num>:3(asz)
3(ban)<n>:3(ban2)
3(ban)<n>:3(ban2)
3(ban)<n>:3(ban2)-ta
3(bariga)<n>:3(barig)
3(bariga)<n>:3(barig)
3(bur'u)<n>:3(bur'u)
3(bur)<n>:3(bur3)
3(disz)<num>:3(disz)
3(disz)<num>:3(disz)
3(disz)<num>:3(disz)-am3
3(disz)<num>:3(disz)-kam
3(disz)<num>:3(disz)-kam
3(disz)<num>:3(disz)-kam
3(disz)<num>:3(disz)-kam-asz
3(disz)<num>:3(disz)-sze3
3(disz@t)<num>:3(disz@t)-kam
3(gesz'u)<num>:3(gesz'u)
3(gesz)<num>:3(gesz2)
3(iku)<n>:3(iku)
3(u)<num>:3(u)
3(u)<num>:3(u)-kam
3(u)<num>:3(u)-sze3
4(asz)<num>:4(asz)
4(ban)<n>:4(ban2)
4(bariga)<n>:4(barig)
4(bariga)<n>:4(barig)
4(bur'u)<n>:4(bur'u)
4(bur)<n>:4(bur3)
4(disz)<num>:4(disz)
4(disz)<num>:4(disz)
4(disz)<num>:4(disz)-am3
4(disz)<num>:4(disz)-kam
4(disz)<num>:4(disz)-kam
4(disz)<num>:4(disz)-sze3
4(disz@v)<num>:4(disz@v)
4(gesz'u)<num>:4(gesz'u)
4(gesz)<num>:4(gesz2)
4(gesz)<num>:4(gesz2)-kam
4(iku)<n>:4(iku)
4(u)<num>:4(u)
4(u)<num>:4(u)-kam
5(asz)<num>:5(asz)
5(ban)<n>:5(ban2)
5(ban)<n>:5(ban2)
5(bur)<n>:5(bur3)
5(disz)<num>:5(disz)
5(disz)<num>:5(disz)
5(disz)<num>:5(disz)-am3
5(disz)<num>:5(disz)-kam
5(disz)<num>:5(disz)-kam
5(disz)<num>:5(disz)-kam
5(disz)<num>:5(disz)-sze3
5(gesz'u)<num>:5(gesz'u)
5(gesz)<num>:5(gesz2)
5(iku)<n>:5(iku)
5(u)<num>:5(u)
5(u)<num>:5(u)-kam
6(disz)<num>:5/6(disz)
6(disz)<num>:5/6(disz)-am3
6(disz)<num>:5/6(disz)-bi
6(disz)<num>:5/6(disz)-kam
6(asz)<num>:6(asz)
6(bur)<n>:6(bur3)
6(disz)<num>:6(disz)
6(disz)<num>:6(disz)
6(disz)<num>:6(disz)
6(disz)<num>:6(disz)-kam
6(disz)<num>:6(disz)-sze3
6(gesz)<num>:6(gesz2)
7(asz)<num>:7(asz)
7(disz)<num>:7(disz)
7(disz)<num>:7(disz)
7(disz)<num>:7(disz)-kam
7(disz)<num>:7(disz)-kam
7(disz)<num>:7(disz)-sze3
7(disz)<num>:7(disz)-ta
7(disz)<num>:7(disz)?
7(gesz)<num>:7(gesz2)
8(asz)<num>:8(asz)
8(bur)<n>:8(bur3)
8(disz)<num>:8(disz)
8(disz)<num>:8(disz)-kam
8(disz)<num>:8(disz)-sze3
8(disz)<num>:8(disz@v)
8(gesz2)<num>:8(gesz2)
9(asz)<num>:9(asz)
9(bur)<n>:9(bur3)
9(disz)<num>:9(disz)
9(disz)<num>:9(disz)-kam
9(gesz)<num>:9(gesz2)
Angugumu<n>:AN-gu2-gu2-mu
Arad<n>:ARAD2
arad<n>:ARAD2
Arad<n>:ARAD2
arad<n>:ARAD2
Arad<n>:ARAD2
Arad<n>:ARAD2
arad<n>:ARAD2-da
Aradam<n>:ARAD2-dam
Aradam<n>:ARAD2-dam
Aradhula<n>:ARAD2-hu-la
Aradmu<n>:ARAD2-mu
Aradmu<n>:ARAD2-mu
Arad<n>:ARAD2-ta
arad<n>:ARAD2-zu
Aradnanna<n>:ARAD2-{d}nanna
Aradszara<n>:ARAD2-{d}szara2
azur<n>:ASZ-ur4
gin<vblex>:DU
dul<n>:DUL3
Ea<n>:E2-A
gana<n>:GAN2
GANAgud<n>:GAN2-gu4
GANmah<n>:GAN2-mah
GANmasz<n>:GAN2-masz
GANmasz<n>:GAN2-masz
Ganmasz<n>:GAN2-masz-ta
gana<n>:GAN2-ta
isz<n>:ISZ
Iszsu<n>:ISZ-su{ki}
ka<n>:KA
Katul<n>:KA-TUL2
Kaya<n>:KA-a-sze3
ku<n>:KU
Kira<n>:Kir-ra
lagab<n>:LAGAB-a
Neduhuli<n>:NE-du8-hu-li2{ki}-sze3
nig<n>:NIG2
Ennunki<n>:Nun-ki
ugula<n>:PA
ugula<n>:PA
SI'Aya<n>:SI-A-a
sig<n>:SIG7
SIGa<n>:SIG7-a
Sigara<n>:SIG7-a-ra
szim<n>:SZIM
SZU<n>:SZU
murub<n>:UD@g-bi
_(_)<num>:[n]
a<n>:a
a<n>:a
aszag<n>:a-&lt;sza3&gt;
Ayakala<n>:a-a-kal-la
Ayakala<n>:a-a-kal-la
Ayakala<n>:a-a-kal-la-ta
Ayamu<n>:a-a-mu
Ayabbamu<n>:a-ab-ba-mu
Ayabbamu<n>:a-ab-ba-mu
Ayabbani<n>:a-ab-ba-ni-ta
Ayalni<n>:a-al-ni
A'annati<n>:a-an-na-ti
Ayatti'a<n>:a-at-ti-a
Aba<n>:a-ba
Abala<n>:a-ba-al-la
Aba'enlilgin<n>:a-ba-{d}en-lil2-gin7-ta
Abaszaragin<n>:a-ba-{d}szara2-gin7
abala<vblex>:a-bala
Abisimti<n>:a-bi2-si2-im-ti
Abilsuen<n>:a-bil-{d}suen
Abuda<n>:a-bu-da
Abuni<n>:a-bu-ni
Abuni<n>:a-bu-ni-ta
Abuka<n>:a-bu3-ka
Adaga<n>:a-da-ga
Adaga<n>:a-da-ga
Adalal<n>:a-da-lal3
Adalal<n>:a-da-lal3
Adaszen<n>:a-da-sze-en6-ta
Adu<n>:a-du
Adudu<n>:a-du-du
Adudu<n>:a-du-du
Adudu<n>:a-du-du
Adumu<n>:a-du-mu
Adumu<n>:a-du-mu
Agalzi<n>:a-gal-zi
Agiwum<n>:a-gi4-um
Agu<n>:a-gu
Agu'a<n>:a-gu-a
Agugu<n>:a-gu-gu
Agugu<n>:a-gu-gu
Agu<n>:a-gu-ta
Ahuya<n>:a-hu-a
Ahu'aga<n>:a-hu-a-ga
Ahuni<n>:a-hu-ni
Ahuni<n>:a-hu-ni
Ahuni<n>:a-hu-ni-ta
Ahuwaqar<n>:a-hu-wa-qar
Ahuwaqar<n>:a-hu-wa-qar
Ahuwer<n>:a-hu-we-er-ta
Akala<n>:a-kal-la
Akala<n>:a-kal-la
Akala<n>:a-kal-la
Akala<n>:a-kal-la
Akala<n>:a-kal-la-ta
Akuku<n>:a-ku-ku-ta
Ali<n>:a-li
Alulu<n>:a-lu5-lu5
Alulu<n>:a-lu5-lu5
Alulu<n>:a-lu5-lu5-ta
aslum<n>:a-lum
aslum<n>:a-lum
Amamaya<n>:a-ma-ma-a
amaru<n>:a-ma-ru-kam
Amurdingir<n>:a-mur-dingir
Amurutu<n>:a-mur-{d}utu
Amurutu<n>:a-mur-{d}utu
anigin<n>:a-nigin2-sze3
Apidingir<n>:a-pi-dingir
Apisal<n>:a-pi4-sal4{ki}
Apisal<n>:a-pi4-sal4{ki}
Apisal<n>:a-pi4-sal4{ki}-ta
ara<n>:a-ra
ara<n>:a-ra2
aria<n>:a-ri-a
aszag<n>:a-sza3
aszag<n>:a-sza3-da
aszag<n>:a-sza3-ga
aszag<n>:a-sza3-ge
Aszi'an<n>:a-szi-an
a<n>:a-ta
Atu<n>:a-tu
Atu<n>:a-tu
Atu<n>:a-tu
Atu<n>:a-tu-sze3
Atu<n>:a-tu-ta
atua<n>:a-tu5-a
A'uda<n>:a-u2-da-ta
aziga<n>:a-zi-ga-sze3
a<n>:a2
Aneni<n>:a2-NE-ni
a'aga<n>:a2-ag2-ga2
a<n>:a2-bi
a<n>:a2-bi
a<num>:a2-bi
Abilati<n>:a2-bi2-la-ti
Abillatum<n>:a2-bil2-la-tum
agiba<n>:a2-ge6-ba-a
Akiti<n>:a2-ki-ti
Anamu<n>:a2-na-mu
Anamu<n>:a2-na-mu
Anita<n>:a2-ni-ta
Ata<n>:a2-ta
Azida<n>:a2-zi-da
abba<n>:ab
abba<n>:ab-ba
Abbagina<n>:ab-ba-gi-na
Abbagina<n>:ab-ba-gi-na
Abbagina<n>:ab-ba-gi-na
Abbagina<n>:ab-ba-gi-na-sze3
Abbagina<n>:ab-ba-gi-na-ta
abba'iri<n>:ab-ba-iri
Abbakala<n>:ab-ba-kal-la
Abbakala<n>:ab-ba-kal-la
Abbamu<n>:ab-ba-mu
Abbamu<n>:ab-ba-mu-ta
Abbasaga<n>:ab-ba-sa6-ga
Abbasaga<n>:ab-ba-sa6-ga-ta
Abbasaga<n>:ab-ba-saga
Abbasaga<n>:ab-ba-saga
ab<n>:ab2
ab<n>:ab2
abmah<n>:ab2-mah2
Adda<n>:ad-da
Adda<n>:ad-da
Addada<n>:ad-da-da
Addakala<n>:ad-da-kal-la
Addamu<n>:ad-da-mu
Addamu<n>:ad-da-mu
adda<n>:ad-da-na-sze3
Adda<n>:ad-da-ta
adKID<n>:ad-kup4
adKID<n>:ad-kup4
adKID<n>:ad-kup4-me
ag<vblex>:ag2-e-dam
aga<n>:aga3
aga<n>:aga3
aga'us<n>:aga3-us2
aga'usgal<n>:aga3-us2-gal
aga'us<n>:aga3-us2-ta
ak<vblex>:ak
ak<vblex>:ak
ak<vblex>:ak
ak<vblex>:ak
ak<vblex>:ak-de3
al<n>:al
al<n>:al
al<n>:al
Alla<n>:al-la
allaharu<n>:al-la-ha-ru
Allamu<n>:al-la-mu
Allapalil<n>:al-la-palil2
Ala<n>:al-la-ta
zir<vblex>:al-zi-ra
alan<n>:alan
alan<n>:alan-da
am<n>:am
am<n>:am
Amma<n>:am3-ma
emahe<n>:ama-e2-mah-e
amagan<n>:ama-gan
Amagina<n>:ama-gi-na
Amakala<n>:ama-kal-la
ama<n>:ama-ni
Amawurszage<n>:ama-ur4-sza3-ge
amar<n>:amar
amar<n>:amar
Amarayasi<n>:amar-a-a-si
Amarkiszi<n>:amar-kiszi17
Ambar<n>:ambar{ki}
An<n>:an
Andagudu'eszeki'ag<n>:an-da-gu-du-esz3-e-ki-ag2
An<n>:an-na
Annahilibi<n>:an-na-hi-li-bi-ta
An<n>:an-na-sze3
Anne<n>:an-ne2
Annebabdu<n>:an-ne2-ba-ab-du7
Annunitum<n>:an-nu-ni-tum
Anszan<n>:an-sza-an{ki}
Anszan<n>:an-sza-an{ki}-ta
Anszan<n>:an-sza{ki}
anubda<n>:an-ub-da
ansze<n>:ansze
Anzubabbar<n>:anzu2{muszen}-babbar2
apin<n>:apin
Apindu'a<n>:apin-du8-a
apinla<n>:apin-la2
apinla<n>:apin-la2
armatum<n>:ar-ma-tum
Arsziah<n>:ar-szi-ah
Arti'a<n>:ar-ti-a
asz<num>:asz-sze3
aszgab<n>:aszgab
aszgab<n>:aszgab
aszgab<n>:aszgab
aszgabgal<n>:aszgab-gal
aszgab<n>:aszgab-ta
azlag<n>:azlag2
azlag<n>:azlag2
ba<n>:ba
ba<vblex>:ba-a
Bayabalum<n>:ba-a-ba-lum
Bayaga<n>:ba-a-ga
ba-e-gar<vblex>:ba-a-gar
ba-hug<vblex>:ba-a-hun
ba-e-hun<vblex>:ba-a-hun-sze3
ba-b-du<vblex>:ba-ab-du8
ba-b-teg<vblex>:ba-ab-ti
ba-b-x-mu<vblex>:ba-ab-x-mu
Baddari<n>:ba-ad-da-ri2
Badirina<n>:ba-ad-iri-na
Badirina<n>:ba-ad-iri-na
bala<vblex>:ba-al-la
ba-n-kur<vblex>:ba-an-ku4
ba-nna-zig<vblex>:ba-an-na-zi
Bayansa<n>:ba-an-sa6
ba-n-teg<vblex>:ba-an-ti
Baba<n>:ba-ba
baba<n>:ba-ba
Babati<n>:ba-ba-ti
Babati<n>:ba-ba-ti
ba-de<vblex>:ba-de6
ba-dim<vblex>:ba-dim2
ba-du<vblex>:ba-du3
ba-du<vblex>:ba-du3-a
ba-du<vblex>:ba-du3-ta
ba-gen<vblex>:ba-gen-na-a
Bahanszer<n>:ba-ha-an-sze-er
ba-hulu<vblex>:ba-hul
ba-hulu<vblex>:ba-hul
ba-hulu<vblex>:ba-hul-a
ba-hulu<vblex>:ba-hul-sze3
ba-hulu<vblex>:ba-hul-ta
ba-hug<vblex>:ba-hun
ba-hug<vblex>:ba-hun
ba-hug<vblex>:ba-hun-ga2
ba-hug<vblex>:ba-hun-ga2-sze3
-kur<vblex>:ba-kux(KWU147)
Bala<n>:ba-la
Bali<n>:ba-li
Balu<n>:ba-lu5
Bamu<n>:ba-mu
-_<vblex>:ba-na-...
ba-nn-a-gin<vblex>:ba-na-gi-in
ba-nne-tar<vblex>:ba-ne-tar-ra
bar<vblex>:ba-ra
barag<vblex>:ba-ra-gi-ne
-sa<vblex>:ba-ra-sa10
Basa<n>:ba-sa6
Basaga<n>:ba-sa6-ga
-teg<vblex>:ba-ti
-teg<vblex>:ba-ti
-teg<vblex>:ba-ti-esz2
ba-usz<vblex>:ba-usz2
ba-usz<vblex>:ba-usz2
ba-ug<vblex>:ba-usz2
ba-zal<vblex>:ba-zal
ba-zal<vblex>:ba-zal
Bazi<n>:ba-zi
Bazi<n>:ba-zi
Bazi<n>:ba-zi
ba-zig<vblex>:ba-zi
Bazi<n>:ba-zi-sze3
bad<n>:bad3
bad<n>:bad3
badgal<n>:bad3-gal
badgal<n>:bad3-gal-bi
bahar<n>:bahar3
bahar<n>:bahar3-me
bala<n>:bala
bala<n>:bala
bala<n>:bala
bala<n>:bala
bala<n>:bala
bala<n>:bala-a
bala<n>:bala-a
bala<n>:bala-a
bala<n>:bala-a
bala<n>:bala-a
bala<n>:bala-a-sze3
bala<vblex>:bala-a-ta
banda<n>:banda3-sze3
bargal<n>:bar-gal2
bar<n>:bar-ra
barsuga<vblex>:bar-su
barsuga<vblex>:bar-su-ga
bar<n>:bar-ta
baragsiga<n>:bara2-si-ga
azu<n>:be-li2-a-zu
Belidu<n>:be-li2-du10
Bikkinum<n>:bi-ik-ki-nu-um
Bibi<n>:bi2-bi2
Bibi'a<n>:bi2-bi2-a
Biduga<n>:bi2-du11-ga
Biduga<n>:bi2-du11-ga
Biduga<n>:bi2-du11-ga-ta
b-i-b-gi<vblex>:bi2-ib2-gi4-me
b-i-n-dug<vblex>:bi2-in-du11
bi-i-n-e<vblex>:bi2-in-ne2-sza-sze3
b-i-sig<vblex>:bi2-se3-ga-sze3
Bilga<n>:bil-ga
Bubu<n>:bu-bu
Bugati<n>:bu-ga-ti
Bu'unum<n>:bu3-u2-nu-um
bulug<n>:bulug4
Burmama<n>:bur-ma-ma
Dayagi<n>:da-a-gi
Dayagi<n>:da-a-gi4
Dayagi<n>:da-a-gi4
dabatum<n>:da-ba-tum
Dada<n>:da-da
Dada<n>:da-da
Dada<n>:da-da
Dada<n>:da-da
Dada<n>:da-da
Dada<n>:da-da
Dadaya<n>:da-da-a
Dadaya<n>:da-da-a
Dadaya<n>:da-da-a
Dadaga<n>:da-da-ga
Dadaga<n>:da-da-ga
Dadaga<n>:da-da-ga
Dadaga<n>:da-da-ga
Dadaga<n>:da-da-ga
Dadaga<n>:da-da-ga-ta
Dadani<n>:da-da-ni
Dada<n>:da-da-ta
Dadu<n>:da-du
Dadumu<n>:da-du-mu
Dagamu<n>:da-ga-mu
Dagi<n>:da-gi
Dagi<n>:da-gi
Damu<n>:da-mu-ta
Da'umma<n>:da-umma{ki}
dab<vblex>:dab-ba
dab<vblex>:dab5-ba
dab<vblex>:dab5-ba-de3
dabin<n>:dabin
dabin<n>:dabin
dab<vblex>:dabx(U8)-ba
dagal<vblex>:dagal
Dal<n>:dal
Dalbana<n>:dal-ba-na
dam<n>:dam
damgar<n>:dam-gar3
damgar<n>:dam-gar3
damgar<n>:dam-gar3
damgar<n>:dam-gar3
damgar<n>:dam-gar3
damgar<n>:dam-gar3-ra
Damsa<n>:dam-sa6-sze3
Danni'a<n>:dan-ni-a-sze3
Dannum<n>:dan-num2
Danu'a<n>:dan-u2-a-ta
Danupi<n>:dan-u2-pi2
dar<n>:dar-bi
de<vblex>:de2-a
de<vblex>:de6-a
did<n>:di
dug-dug<vblex>:di-di
dikud<n>:di-ku5-bi-me
Dikumiszar<n>:di-ku5-mi-szar-ta
dida<n>:dida
didli<vblex>:didli
didli<vblex>:didli
didli<vblex>:didli
didli<vblex>:didli
Dingiradah<n>:dingir-a2-dah
Dingirbani<n>:dingir-ba-ni-ta
Dingirga'isa<n>:dingir-ga2-i3-sa6
Dingira<n>:dingir-ra
Dingira<n>:dingir-ra
Dingirrabi<n>:dingir-ra-bi
Dingirrabi<n>:dingir-ra-bi2
Dingirrabi<n>:dingir-ra-bi2-ta
Dingirra<n>:dingir-ra-ta
Dingirsudan<n>:dingir-su-dan
Dingirsurabi<n>:dingir-su-ra-bi2-ta
